Maryland, session 2026, SB0404.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
12–111.
(a) IN THIS SECTION, “CRIMINAL JUSTICE AGENCY” INCLUDES THE
SPECIAL INVESTIGATIONS UNIT OF THE BALTIMORE CITY DEPARTMENT OF
HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT OR ITS SUCCESSOR.
(B) The Administration shall keep a record of each application or other document
filed with it and each certificate or other official document that it issues.
[(b)] (C) (1) Subject to § 4–320 of the General Provisions Article, and except
as otherwise provided by law, all records of the Administration are public records and open
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0404*

SENATE BILL 404
to public inspection during office hours.
(2) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, the Administrator may
classify as confidential and not open to public inspection any record or record entry:
(i) That is over 5 years old; or
(ii) That relates to any happening that occurred over 5 years earlier.
(3) Subject to § 4–320 of the General Provisions Article, a record or record
entry of any age shall be open to inspection by authorized representatives of any federal,
State, or local governmental agency.
(4) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, the Administrator may not
open to public inspection any record or record entry that is:
(i) All or part of a licensed driver’s public driving record; and
(ii) Over 3 years old.
(5) Subject to paragraph (6) of this subsection, the Administration may not
permit public inspection of a digital photographic image or signature of an individual, or
the actual stored data thereof, recorded by the Administration.
(6) The Administration may make a digital photographic image or
signature of an individual, or the actual stored data thereof, recorded by the Administration
available to:
(i) The courts;
(ii) Criminal justice agencies;
(iii) Driver license authorities;
(iv) The individual;
(v) The individual’s attorney;
(vi) Third parties designated by the individual; and
(vii) The Child Support Administration.
[(c)] (D) Except for records required by law to be kept in their original or other
specified form, the Administrator may order any record of the Administration to be kept on
microfilm or in other microform, and the original destroyed.
[(d)] (E) Except for records required by law to be kept longer, the Administrator

SENATE BILL 404 3
may destroy any record of the Administration that it has kept for 3 years or more and that
the Administrator considers obsolete and unnecessary to the work of the Administration.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.